zh-CN: 制动软管端接头类型: 90 度弯头配件; Banjo; 泡式扩口; 内螺纹扩口（倒扩口）; 内螺纹; 外螺纹扩口（倒扩口）; 外螺纹; 快速连接; 直通接头; 其他
hu: Fékcső végcsatlakozójának típusa: 90 fokos könyökcsatlakozó; Banjo; Gömbre peremezett; Belső menetes peremes (befele peremezett); Belső menetes; Külső menetes peremes (befele peremezett); Külső menetes; Gyorscsatlakozó; Egyenes csatlakozó; Egyéb
da: Type af bremseslangetilslutning: 90-graders vinkelbeslag; Banjo; Bubble flare; Indvendig konisk gevind; Indvendigt gevind; Udvendig konisk gevind; Udvendigt gevind; Hurtigkobling; Lige beslag; Andet
es: Tipo de conexión de los extremos de la manguera de freno: Conector acodado a 90 grados; Banjo; Abocardado tipo burbuja; Abocardado hembra (abocardado invertido); Roscado hembra; Abocardado macho (abocardado invertido); Roscado macho; Conexión rápida; Conector recto; Otro
lt-LT: Stabdžių žarnos galinės jungties tipas: 90 laipsnių kampinė jungtis; „Banjo“; Burbulinis valcavimas; Vidinio sriegio jungtis (apversta); Vidinis sriegis; Išorinio sriegio jungtis (apversta); Išorinis sriegis; Greitojo sujungimo; Tiesi jungtis; Kita
nb: Endekoblingstype for bremseslange: 90-graders albuekobling; Banjo; Boblekoning; Hunnkon (invertert koning); Innvendig gjenget; Hannkon (invertert koning); Utvendig gjenget; Hurtigkobling; Rett kobling; Annet
vi: Loại đầu nối ống phanh: Đầu nối khuỷu 90 độ; Banjo; Loe phồng; Loe cái (loe ngược); Ren cái; Loe đực (loe ngược); Ren đực; Kết nối nhanh; Đầu nối thẳng; Khác
pt-BR: Tipo de conexão da extremidade da mangueira de freio: Conexão de cotovelo de 90 graus; Banjo; Flange bolha; Flange fêmea (flange invertido); Rosca fêmea; Flange macho (flange invertido); Rosca macho; Engate rápido; Conexão reta; Outro
sk-SK: Typ koncovky brzdovej hadice: 90-stupňová uhlová koncovka; Banjo; Bublinový pertel (Bubble flare); Vnútorný pertel (obrátený pertel); S vnútorným závitom; Vonkajší pertel (obrátený pertel); S vonkajším závitom; Rýchlospojka; Rovná koncovka; Iný
zh-TW: 煞車軟管端接頭類型: 90 度彎管接頭; 班卓接頭; 泡狀擴口; 母擴口 (反向擴口); 內螺紋; 公擴口 (反向擴口); 外螺紋; 快拆接頭; 直通接頭; 其他
hr-HR: Vrsta priključka za kraj kočionog crijeva: Koljenasti priključak pod 90 stupnjeva; Banjo; Bubble flare; Ženski konusni (obrnuti konus); Ženski navoj; Muški konusni (obrnuti konus); Muški navoj; Brza spojnica; Ravni priključak; Ostalo
th: ประเภทข้อต่อปลายสายท่ออ่อนเบรก: ข้อต่อข้องอ 90 องศา; แบนโจ; บับเบิลแฟลร์; แฟลร์ตัวเมีย (แฟลร์คว่ำ); เกลียวใน; แฟลร์ตัวผู้ (แฟลร์คว่ำ); เกลียวนอก; ข้อต่อสวมเร็ว; ข้อต่อตรง; อื่นๆ
tr: Fren hortumu uç bağlantı tipi: 90 derece dirsekli rakor; Banjo; Bombe havşalı; Dişi havşalı (ters havşalı); Dişi dişli; Erkek havşalı (ters havşalı); Erkek dişli; Hızlı bağlantı; Düz rakor; Diğer
fr: Type de raccord d’extrémité du flexible de frein: Raccord coudé à 90 degrés; Banjo; Collet bombé; Évasement femelle (évasement inversé); Filetage femelle; Évasement mâle (évasement inversé); Filetage mâle; Raccord rapide; Raccord droit; Autre
ja: ブレーキホースエンドフィッティングタイプ: 90度エルボ継手; バンジョー; バブルフレア; メスフレア (インバーテッドフレア); めねじ; オスフレア (インバーテッドフレア); おねじ; クイックコネクト; ストレート継手; その他
it: Tipo di raccordo terminale del tubo freno: Raccordo a gomito a 90 gradi; Banjo; Svasatura a bolla; Svasatura femmina (svasatura invertita); Filettato femmina; Svasatura maschio (svasatura invertita); Filettato maschio; Attacco rapido; Raccordo dritto; Altro
el: Τύπος συνδέσμου άκρου σωλήνα φρένου: Γωνιακό ρακόρ 90 μοιρών; Banjo; Φούσκωμα (bubble flare); Θηλυκό ρακόρ (ανεστραμμένο); Θηλυκό σπείρωμα; Αρσενικό ρακόρ (ανεστραμμένο); Αρσενικό σπείρωμα; Ταχυσύνδεσμος; Ίσιο ρακόρ; Άλλο
bg-BG: Тип накрайник за спирачен маркуч: Коляно на 90 градуса; Банджо; Сферично разширение; Вътрешно развалцоване (обърнато); Вътрешна резба; Външно развалцоване (обърнато); Външна резба; Бърза връзка; Прав фитинг; Други
sv: Typ av ändkoppling för bromsslang: 90-graders vinkelkoppling; Banjokoppling; Bubbelkoning; Hona (inverterad koning); Innergängad; Hane (inverterad koning); Yttergängad; Snabbkoppling; Rak koppling; Övrigt
de: Typ der Endverschraubung der Bremsleitung: 90-Grad-Winkelanschluss; Banjo-Anschluss; Bubble Flare (F-Bördel); Innengewinde-Bördel (Inverted Flare); Innengewinde; Außengewinde-Bördel (Inverted Flare); Außengewinde; Schnellverschluss; Gerader Anschluss; Sonstige
nl: Remleiding eindstuk type: 90-graden elleboogkoppeling; Banjo; Bubble flare; Inwendige felsrand (inverted flare); Binnendraad; Uitwendige felsrand (inverted flare); Buitendraad; Snelkoppeling; Rechte koppeling; Overig
fi: Jarruletkun pään liittimen tyyppi: 90 asteen kulmaliitin; Banjoliitin; Pallokartio; Sisäpuolinen kartio (käänteinen kartio); Sisäkierre; Ulkopuolinen kartio (käänteinen kartio); Ulkokierre; Pikaliitin; Suora liitin; Muu
en: Brake hose end fitting type: 90-degree elbow fitting; Banjo; Bubble flare; Female flare (inverted flare); Female threaded; Male flare (inverted flare); Male threaded; Quick connect; Straight fitting; Other
pl: Typ końcówki przewodu hamulcowego: Kolanko 90 stopni; Złącze banjo; Spęcznienie baryłkowe; Złącze stożkowe wewnętrzne (odwrócone); Gwint wewnętrzny; Złącze stożkowe zewnętrzne (odwrócone); Gwint zewnętrzny; Szybkozłącze; Złącze proste; Inne
pt-PT: Tipo de ligação final da mangueira de travão: Encaixe em cotovelo de 90 graus; Banjo; Abocardamento em bolha; Abocardamento fêmea (abocardamento invertido); Com rosca fêmea; Abocardamento macho (abocardamento invertido); Com rosca macho; Ligação rápida; Encaixe reto; Outro
sl-SI: Vrsta priključka na koncu zavorne cevi: 90-stopinjski kolenski priključek; Banjo; Izbočen (bubble flare); Ženski s konusom (obrnjeni konus); Ženski navoj; Moški s konusom (obrnjeni konus); Moški navoj; Hitra spojka; Ravni priključek; Drugo
ro-RO: Tipul de racord al capătului furtunului de frână: Fiting cot la 90 de grade; Banjo; Evazare tip sferă; Evazare mamă (evazare inversată); Filet interior; Evazare tată (evazare inversată); Filet exterior; Conectare rapidă; Fiting drept; Altele
ru: Тип концевого фитинга тормозного шланга: Угловой фитинг 90 градусов; Банджо; Выпуклая вальцовка; Внутренняя резьба (вогнутая вальцовка); С внутренней резьбой; Наружная резьба (вогнутая вальцовка); С наружной резьбой; Быстросъемное соединение; Прямой фитинг; Другое
ko: 브레이크 호스 끝단 피팅 유형: 90도 엘보 피팅; 반조; 버블 플레어; 암 플레어(인버티드 플레어); 암나사; 수 플레어(인버티드 플레어); 수나사; 퀵 커넥트; 스트레이트 피팅; 기타
cs: Typ koncovky brzdové hadice: 90stupňová úhlová spojka; Banjo; Vypouklý pertl; Vnitřní pertl (obrácený); S vnitřním závitem; Vnější pertl (obrácený); S vnějším závitem; Rychlospojka; Rovná spojka; Jiné